tools/fst/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON NvSuffixes

! "it"/3nv ("to be such"): Suffixes.csv's own condPrec ("type:a") is a
! grammatical-feature condition the bulk generator can't model, but
! it's confirmed directly by gold: both target words' root is tagged
! "1a" (adjective), matching this row's own condition exactly.
! Q-context gives 2 candidates, both literal "it" with Suppression --
! no real ambiguity (both actions identical), resolves to a single
! "SUPPRit" (for the plain q-kept "qanuq" root spelling). A plain "it"
! (no marker) is ALSO needed since "qanuq"/1a already has its own
! q-dropped spelling variant "qanu" wired separately -- attaching to
! THAT spelling needs no further deletion. Previously investigated and
! confirmed low-value on its own (round-16-era: only 3 gold words are
! 3nv-tagged at all) but 2 of those 3 are exactly this suffix's own
! target words, so worth wiring now that they're the last remaining
! gap. Neither is decomposable by the real Java analyzer either
! (confirmed via --pipeline).
++it+3nv:it VerbContinuations ;
++it+3nv:SUPPRit VerbContinuations ;

! li/4vv ("to make that s.t. or s.o. become such") has condPrec
! "id:it/3nv" -- Suffixes.csv's own single-id trigger condition,
! wired the same way as the mut/nngit/u/juq triggers above and below
! (generate_affixes.py's TRIGGER_LEXICON): li/4vv is now reachable
! ONLY via AfterItTriggerSuffix, not from the general VerbContinuations
! hub it used to reach through the *Speculative lexicon (which is
! reachable from every verb stem, not just after it/3nv specifically).
++it+3nv:it AfterItTriggerSuffix ;
++it+3nv:SUPPRit AfterItTriggerSuffix ;

! "uq"/1nv ("to go through", the "via"-case-only sibling suffix):
! Suffixes.csv's own condPrec ("cas:via") is a grammatical-feature
! condition the bulk generator can't model in general, but it directly
! names the same case "tigut"/tn-via-p already marks -- t-context only
! (V/k/q are all "-", no candidate at all), Suppression (delete the
! preceding "tigut"'s own trailing t). "tigut"/tn-via-p (NounEndings
! above) previously had no continuation past its own bare terminal;
! gained one here specifically so "uq"/1nv can attach -- confirmed via
! "tusaajitiguuqtuq"/"tusaajitiguurunniiqtuq" (the latter also needs
! "uq"'s own trailing q dropped when junniiq/1vv's existing
! "SUPPRrunniiq" candidate follows -- already wired, no extra piece
! needed there) and the real Java analyzer's own output before wiring.
++uq+1nv:SUPPRuq VerbContinuations ;

++liri+1nv:SUPPRliri VerbContinuations ;

! "giik"/2nv: "ajjigiinngittunik" = {ajji:ajji/1n}{gii:giik/2nv}
! {nngit:nngit/1vv}{tu:juq/1vn}{nik:nik/tn-acc-p} -- V-context only
! (V-form=giik/Neutral). t-context is a genuine single candidate
! (Insertion "i") but unused here (root "ajji" is vowel-final);
! k/q-contexts use the unbuilt Fusion primitive, skipped.
++giik+2nv:giik VerbContinuations ;

! "liaq"/2nv ("motion towards: to go to"): clean single V-context
! candidate per Suffixes.csv (Neutral, bare "liaq"); "aanniaviliaqtunut"
! attaches after vik/3vn (vowel-final surface).
++liaq+2nv:liaq VerbContinuations ;

! "maligaliurviliarsimajut" needs a SECOND spelling, "liar" (own q->r,
! a free variant not derived from any general rule -- same "different
! literal spellings" category as naq/1vv's own "nar"), reached with
! SUPPR since root "maligaliurvik" (k-final) has its own trailing k
! dropped first. The root itself is no longer excluded -- it's been
! reachable since the CommonCompositeWords.csv skip_if_combination
! filter was removed earlier this session (re-tested and found to
! LOWER the false-positive count, not raise it), so the original
! "adding the root risks amplifying a collision" concern no longer
! applies; only this suffix-side piece was still missing. Not
! decomposable by the real Java analyzer either (confirmed via
! --pipeline).
++liaq+2nv:SUPPRliar VerbContinuations ;

! "iq"/1nv: clean single V-context candidate per Suffixes.csv (Neutral,
! bare "iq"); its own trailing q survives until something downstream
! needs it gone (si/1vv's own literal spellings and ut/1vn's SUPPR-
! prefixed "ruti" both already handle that, same established pattern as
! every other q-final suffix). t/k/q-context (Insertion "ng"/"a",
! Suppression) not attempted: unattested in this cluster.
++iq+1nv:iq VerbContinuations ;

! "liuq"/1nv ("to be building/working on s.t."): gaq/1vn's own SUPPR only
! deletes what PRECEDES gaq (malik's own final consonant) -- gaq's OWN
! trailing "q" survives ("maligaq" bare, "malik"+"gaq"). So liuq attaches
! to a Q-FINAL stem here, not a vowel-final one as it first looked from
! the surface alone: liuq needs ITS OWN SUPPR marker to delete gaq's
! trailing q. Suffixes.csv's q-form gives "liuq"/"jjiuq" (both
! Suppression) as the two listed candidates -- but gold ALSO attests
! "liur" (q -> r) for the exact same context, a candidate this CSV row
! doesn't list anywhere at all ("maligaliurti" alongside "maligaliuqti",
! same preceding "ga", same following "ti"/ji -- genuine free variation).
! Same "wire both literal spellings in parallel" treatment as
! ngagut/agut above: "SUPPRliuq" and "SUPPRliur" are different strings
! once SUPPR resolves, so no extra rule needed -- whichever the real
! word's own spelling is picks the matching path. "jjiuq" not attempted:
! unattested in this gold cluster. V+k contexts (V-form=liuq/Neutral,
! k-form=liuq/Suppression) alone, without the q-context above, are not
! independently gold-attested here: every gold example attaches liuq
! directly after a q-final suffix.
++liuq+1nv:SUPPRliuq VerbContinuations ;
++liuq+1nv:SUPPRliur VerbContinuations ;

! "qaq"/1nv ("to have/possess"), needed by "jjut"/1vn's "pijjutiqaqtu*"
! cluster -- clean single V-context candidate (Neutral), reused unchanged
! for t/k/q since "jjuti" (what it always attaches to here) is
! vowel-final. Needs BOTH VnSuffixes (for "juq"/1vn to follow,
! "pijjutiqaqtuq"/"...tunik") and TvEndings directly ("pijjutiqaqtut"
! attaches "jut"/tv-ger-3p straight onto qaq, no juq/1vn in between). A
! second gold example, "akiqangittuq", is NOT reached: it produces
! "akiqaNNgittuq" (double n) from plain concatenation + SUPPR, not gold's
! "akiqaNgittuq" (single n) -- something reduces nngit's own doubled "nn"
! to a single "n" specifically after qaq's deletion, not explained by any
! mechanism built so far (same unexplained-surface-simplification
! category as "iglu"->"illu"). Not pursued further; revisit once the
! nn->n reduction is understood.
++qaq+1nv:qaq VerbContinuations ;

! "gi"/1nv ("have as; possess"): "isumagillugu" = {isuma:isuma/1n}
! {gi:gi/1nv}{llugu:lugu/tv-part-1s-3s-prespas}. V-context only
! (V-form=gi/Neutral); t-context is a genuine single candidate too
! (Insertion "i") but unused by this word (root "isuma" is vowel-final)
! and not implemented (would need its own marker, deferred); k/q-contexts
! use "Fusion", an unbuilt primitive, skipped. Also gained its own
! q-context literal spelling, "ri" (Suffixes.csv gives this directly as a
! Fusion candidate -- mechanically identical to SUPPR, deletes the
! preceding q) -- needed for "apiqqusirijara" (usiq's own bare "qusiq"
! candidate, own q kept, then gi's "ri" eats it) -- and reaches
! VnSuffixes as well as TvEndings, so it can be followed by a further
! vn-suffix like "jaq"/1vn ("ilagijaujuq" needs gi -> jaq/1vn), not just
! terminate in a verb ending. "ut"/1vn's "quti" and "usiq"/1vn's "qusiq"
! candidates above both needed a path into NvSuffixes so "gi" can follow
! them at all -- neither had ever reached a noun-to-verb suffix before.
++gi+1nv:gi VerbContinuations ;
++gi+1nv:SUPPRri VerbContinuations ;

! "u"/1nv: "ministaujuq" = {minista:minista/1n}{u:u/1nv}{juq:juq/1vn} and
! "piliriangujuq" = {piliria:piliriaq/1n}{ngu:u/1nv}{juq:juq/1vn}.
! Suffixes.csv's "u" row has action1+action2 in every context, same shape
! as tn-nom-p's "it" -- confirmed (by tracing MorphAnalyzerValidation.kt)
! this is a genuine algorithmic condition, not lexically arbitrary
! ambiguity: "ng" is epenthesized before "u" whenever the stem left
! behind (after any q/k-deletion) ends in two vowels in a row (avoiding a
! 3-vowel run), and stays absent otherwise. V-context has no deletion
! (minista -> ministau); k/q-context deletes first, same as "liri"/"qai"
! (piliriaq -> piliria, SUPPR), *then* the same VV-gated insertion check
! applies to what's left (piliria ends "ia" -> VV -> ng inserted ->
! piliriangu). New VVNG marker (phonology.xfscript) implements the
! insertion the same way SUPPR implements deletion: invisible flag +
! context rule + cleanup, not the vv/consonant text itself, so the
! trigger is exactly "two vowels precede", not tied to which two vowels.
! t-context is DELIBERATELY NOT implemented: it has two structurally
! different candidates (delete-t+insert-ng vs keep-t+insert-i) with no
! algorithmic condition anywhere in the code selecting between them --
! genuinely lexically arbitrary -- AND unattested in the gold-standard
! sample. Also reaches TvEndings directly (not just another verb-to-noun
! derivational suffix): "qujannamiingujutit" =
! {qujannamiik:qujannamiik/1a}{u:u/1nv}{jutit:jutit/tv-ger-2s} needs "u"
! to reach a verb ENDING, since "u" is itself noun-to-verb and the stem
! it produces should be able to take any verb ending, the same "every
! X-producing morpheme should reach the full X-continuation set" gap the
! NounContinuations/VerbContinuations hub was built to close.
++u+1nv:SUPPRVVNGu VerbContinuations ;
++u+1nv:SUPPRVVNGu AfterUTriggerSuffix ;
